Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 5. Branches and Facilities.

§ 6.2-831.
Establishment of branch banks; redesignation of main office.

A bank may establish and operate one or more branch offices, and a bank may relocate a main or branch office, provided the bank applies to the Commission for authority to establish or relocate any such office. Applications shall be made in writing on a form prescribed by the Commission and shall be accompanied by the fee established pursuant to §

6.2-908

. As used in this section, “branch office” does not include any automated teller machine, cash-dispensing machine, or similar electronic or computer terminal, regardless of whether it (i) is located on bank premises or premises properly considered part of an authorized office of the bank or (ii) receives or records deposits, disburses loan proceeds, or provides for electronic fund transfers.

The Commission shall have 30 days from the date it receives a complete application in which to review a branch proposal or a proposed relocation. The review period may be extended for an additional 30 days. The Commission may deny such an application if the Commission finds that a proposal would have a detrimental effect on the applicant bank’s safety and soundness or that it is otherwise not in the public interest. A branch office that has been denied shall not be established and a relocation that has been denied shall not be carried out. If the Commission does not issue a denial of a branch proposal or a proposed relocation within 30 days, or 60 days if the review period is extended, the proposed branch office or offices, or the proposed relocation, shall be authorized, and the branch or branches may be established and operated, or the relocation may be completed.

The office at which a bank begins business shall be designated initially as its main office. Thereafter, the board of directors may redesignate as the main office any authorized office of the bank in the Commonwealth. The bank shall notify the Commission of any such redesignation not later than 30 days before its effective date and confirm the redesignation to the Commission within 10 days of its occurrence.

A bank shall be subject to the prohibition in §

6.2-842

against establishing or maintaining a branch in the Commonwealth on the premises or property of an affiliate if the affiliate engages in commercial activities.

The Commission may impose a civil penalty not exceeding $2,000 upon any bank that it determines, in proceedings commenced in accordance with the Commission’s Rules, has violated the provisions of this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-29; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-113; 1986, c. 505, § 6.1-39.3; 1987, cc. 352, 556; 1991, c. 322; 1992, c. 136; 1994, c. 7; 1996, c. 26; 1999, c. 545; 2007, c. 1; 2010, c. 794; 2015, cc. 19, 445.

Cross references.

As to authority of the Commission to adopt regulations defining what is or is not a branch within this section and further defining what activities are or are not permitted to be conducted at a location which is not authorized as a branch under this section, see §

6.2-804

. For Corporation Commission’s Rules, see 5 VAC 5-20-10 et seq.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 19 and 445 are identical, and in subsection A, added the last sentence.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1387 (1970).

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1159 (1972).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1668 (1975).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

For article, “Evolution of the Virginia Banking Structure 1962-1974: The Effects of the Buck-Holland Bill,” see 16 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 567 (1975).

For a special section on the Virginia potential for banking structure and statewide branching, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 93 (1976).

For article, “The ‘Public Interest’ and Bond and Savings and Loan Expansion in Virginia,” see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1977).

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1978).

For article discussing the question of when it is in the public interest to authorize a new bank, see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 533 (1979).

§ 6.2-832.
Establishment of automated teller machines and electronic terminals.

No application to, or approval from, the Commission shall be required for a bank to establish or operate an automated teller machine, cash-dispensing machine, or similar electronic or computer terminal, regardless of whether it (i) is located on bank premises or premises properly considered part of an authorized office of the bank or (ii) receives or records deposits, disburses loan proceeds, or provides for electronic fund transfers.

A Virginia state bank, as defined in §

6.2-836

, may establish and operate such automated teller machines, cash-dispensing machines, or similar electronic or computer terminals in the Commonwealth, provided the bank complies with all Commonwealth and federal laws and regulations applicable to such machines and terminals. An out-of-state bank, as defined in §

6.2-836

, may establish and operate such automated teller machines, cash-dispensing machines, or similar electronic or computer terminals in the Commonwealth, provided the bank complies with all Commonwealth, home state and federal laws applicable to such machines and terminals.

The Commission may adopt regulations affecting electronic fund transfers by banks if it finds such regulations necessary for the protection of the public interest.

History.

1997, c. 141, § 6.1-39.4:1; 2010, c. 794; 2015, cc. 19, 445.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 19 and 445 are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 6.2-833.
Bank agent for depository institution.

A bank may act as the agent of any other depository institution in receiving deposits and providing other services without being deemed a branch of such other depository institution.

History.

1995, c. 301, § 6.1-39.5; 1997, c. 24; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-834.
Operation of branch office under different name; civil penalty.

No branch office shall be operated or advertised under any other name than that of the identical name of the bank, unless (i) permission is first obtained from the Commission and (ii) the different name shall contain or have added thereto language clearly indicating that it is a branch office of the bank or a division of the bank.

The Commission may impose a civil penalty not exceeding $2,000 upon any bank that it determines, in proceedings commenced in accordance with the Commission’s Rules, has violated the provisions of this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-28, 6-29; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-41, 6.1-113; 1979, c. 59; 1987, c. 556; 1992, c. 136; 1994, c. 7; 2010, c. 794; 2018, cc. 130, 266.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 130 and 266 are identical, and substituted “office of the bank or a division of the bank” for “office and of which bank it is an office” at the end of subsection A.

§ 6.2-835.
Banking facilities in certain hospitals or federal areas.

The Commission, when in its discretion banking facilities are required (i) for patients in, students at, or employees of hospitals operated by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs or by the Commonwealth or (ii) for members of the armed forces at any military or naval federal area in the Commonwealth, may permit any bank that is authorized to do business in the Commonwealth to establish and operate such banking facilities as are required in any such hospital or federal area.

The banking facilities so established shall be operated in accordance with the laws of the Commonwealth relating thereto. The Commission may permit only certain specified services to be established and operated.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-29.1; 1952, c. 75; 1956, c. 45; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-42; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs” was substituted for “Veterans Administration.”